Indiana, session 2026, HB1196.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-4-15-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 121, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Regarding an individual's
most recent separation from employment before filing an initial or
additional claim for benefits, an individual who voluntarily left the
employment without good cause in connection with the work or was
discharged from the employment for just cause is ineligible for waiting
period or benefit rights for the week in which the disqualifying
separation occurred and until:
(1) the individual has earned remuneration in employment in at
least eight (8) weeks; and
(2) the remuneration earned equals or exceeds the product of the
weekly benefit amount multiplied by eight (8).
If the qualification amount has not been earned at the expiration of an
individual's benefit period, the unearned amount shall be carried
forward to an extended benefit period or to the benefit period of a
subsequent claim.
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141


(b) When it has been determined that an individual has been
separated from employment under disqualifying conditions as outlined
in this section, the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim, as initially determined, shall be reduced by an amount
determined as follows:
(1) For the first separation from employment under disqualifying
conditions, the maximum benefit amount of the individual's
current claim is equal to the result of:
(A) the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim, as initially determined; multiplied by
(B) seventy-five percent (75%);
rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next
higher dollar.
(2) For the second separation from employment under
disqualifying conditions, the maximum benefit amount of the
individual's current claim is equal to the result of:
(A) the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim determined under subdivision (1); multiplied by
(B) eighty-five percent (85%);
rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next
higher dollar.
(3) For the third and any subsequent separation from employment
under disqualifying conditions, the maximum benefit amount of
the individual's current claim is equal to the result of:
(A) the maximum benefit amount of the individual's current
claim determined under subdivision (2); multiplied by
(B) ninety percent (90%);
rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar ($1)) to the next
higher dollar.
(c) The disqualifications provided in this section shall be subject to
the following modifications:
(1) An individual shall not be subject to disqualification because
of separation from the individual's employment if:
(A) the individual left to accept with another employer
previously secured permanent full-time work which offered
reasonable expectation of continued covered employment and
betterment of wages or working conditions and thereafter was
employed on said job;
(B) having been simultaneously employed by two (2)
employers, the individual leaves one (1) such employer
voluntarily without good cause in connection with the work
but remains in employment with the second employer with a
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141


reasonable expectation of continued employment; or
(C) the individual left to accept recall made by a base period
employer.
(2) An individual whose unemployment is the result of medically
substantiated physical disability and who is involuntarily
unemployed after having made reasonable efforts to maintain the
employment relationship shall not be subject to disqualification
under this section for such separation.
(3) An individual who left work to enter the armed forces of the
United States shall not be subject to disqualification under this
section for such leaving of work.
(4) An individual whose employment is terminated under the
compulsory retirement provision of a collective bargaining
agreement to which the employer is a party, or under any other
plan, system, or program, public or private, providing for
compulsory retirement and who is otherwise eligible shall not be
deemed to have left the individual's work voluntarily without
good cause in connection with the work. However, if such
individual subsequently becomes reemployed and thereafter
voluntarily leaves work without good cause in connection with the
work, the individual shall be deemed ineligible as outlined in this
section.
(5) An otherwise eligible individual shall not be denied benefits
for any week because the individual is in training approved under
Section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974, nor shall the
individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter
such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment,
or because of the application to any week in training of provisions
in this law (or any applicable federal unemployment
compensation law), relating to availability for work, active search
for work, or refusal to accept work. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "suitable employment" means with respect
to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level
than the individual's past adversely affected employment (as
defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974), and wages for
such work at not less than eighty percent (80%) of the individual's
average weekly wage as determined for the purposes of the Trade
Act of 1974.
(6) An individual is not subject to disqualification because of
separation from the individual's employment if:
(A) the employment was outside the individual's labor market;
(B) the individual left to accept previously secured full-time
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141


work with an employer in the individual's labor market; and
(C) the individual actually became employed with the
employer in the individual's labor market.
(7) An individual who, but for the voluntary separation to move
to another labor market to join a spouse who had moved to that
labor market, shall not be disqualified for that voluntary
separation, if the individual is otherwise eligible for benefits.
Benefits paid to the spouse whose eligibility is established under
this subdivision shall not be charged against the employer from
whom the spouse voluntarily separated.
(8) An individual shall not be subject to disqualification if the
individual voluntarily left employment or was discharged due to
circumstances directly caused by domestic or family violence (as
defined in IC 31-9-2-42). An individual who may be entitled to
benefits based on this modification may apply to the office of the
attorney general under IC 5-26.5 to have an address designated by
the office of the attorney general to serve as the individual's
address for purposes of this article.
(9) An individual shall not be subject to disqualification if the
individual
(A) has requested an exemption from an employer's
COVID-19 immunization requirement;
(B) has complied with the requirements set forth in
IC 22-5-4.6; and
(C) was discharged from employment for failing or refusing to
receive an immunization. against COVID-19.
As used in this subsection, "labor market" means the area surrounding
an individual's permanent residence, outside which the individual
cannot reasonably commute on a daily basis. In determining whether
an individual can reasonably commute under this subdivision, the
department shall consider the nature of the individual's job.
(d) "Discharge for just cause" as used in this section is defined to
include but not be limited to:
(1) separation initiated by an employer for falsification of an
employment application to obtain employment through
subterfuge;
(2) knowing violation of a reasonable and uniformly enforced rule
of an employer, including a rule regarding attendance;
(3) if an employer does not have a rule regarding attendance, an
individual's unsatisfactory attendance, if good cause for absences
or tardiness is not established;
(4) damaging the employer's property through willful and wanton
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141


misconduct;
(5) refusing to obey instructions;
(6) conduct endangering safety of self or coworkers;
(7) incarceration in jail following conviction of a misdemeanor or
felony by a court of competent jurisdiction; or
(8) any breach of duty in connection with work which is
reasonably owed an employer by an employee.
(e) To verify that domestic or family violence has occurred, an
individual who applies for benefits under subsection (c)(8) shall
provide one (1) of the following:
(1) A report of a law enforcement agency (as defined in
IC 10-13-3-10).
(2) A protection order issued under IC 34-26-5.
(3) A foreign protection order (as defined in IC 34-6-2.1-76).
(4) An affidavit from a domestic violence service provider
verifying services provided to the individual by the domestic
violence service provider.
SECTION 2. IC 22-5-4.6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. (Exemptions from COVID-19 Immunization
Requirements).
SECTION 3. IC 22-5-9.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 9.4. Immunization Requirements
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "coercion" means the use of
intimidation, threats, or force intended to convince an individual
to take an immunization against the individual's will.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "employee" means an individual
who works for an employer on a full-time or part-time basis, either
paid or unpaid. The term includes:
(1) an independent contractor;
(2) a subcontractor; and
(3) a student who works as a trainee or an intern.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "employer" means:
(1) the state;
(2) any board, commission, department, division, bureau,
committee, agency, governmental subdivision, military body,
authority, or other instrumentality of the state;
(3) a state educational institution (as defined in
IC 21-7-13-32);
(4) a political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13); or
(5) a sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141


liability company, or other entity that has one (1) or more
employees.
The term does not include the United States and its agencies and
instrumentalities.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "immunization" means the
treatment of an individual with a vaccine intended to produce
immunity.
Sec. 5. (a) An employer may require an immunization only if the
employer respects the employee's right to refuse an immunization.
(b) An employee shall be free from:
(1) coercion; or
(2) an adverse action, including discrimination with respect
to:
(A) the employee's tenure, compensation, and benefits;
(B) terms, conditions, and privileges of employment;
(C) uniform or attire;
(D) use of areas open to immunized employees; or
(E) testing in the absence of symptoms when immunized
employees are not equally required to submit to testing;
based on the employee's refusal of an immunization.
Sec. 6. A:
(1) contract;
(2) bid specification; or
(3) agreement;
that is entered into, issued, amended, or renewed after March 31,
2026, may not contain a provision requiring an employee to receive
an immunization that limits in any way the rights and protections
provided to an employee under this chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
(1) require an employer to impose a requirement that
employees receive an immunization; or
(2) preclude an employer from offering an immunization at no
cost to an employee.
(b) If an employer offers an immunization at no cost to an
employee, the employer must notify the employee at the time of the
offer in writing that the employee has the right to refuse the
immunization free from coercion or an adverse action with the
following statement: "IC 22-5-9.4-7 requires that an employer
notify an employee that an employee's acceptance of an
immunization is voluntary. An employee has the right to refuse the
immunization free from coercion or an adverse action, including
discrimination with respect to:
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141


(1) the employee's tenure, compensation, and benefits;
(2) terms, conditions, and privileges of employment;
(3) uniform or attire;
(4) use of areas open to immunized employees; or
(5) testing in the absence of symptoms when immunized
employees are not equally required to submit to testing.
If an employee believes that the employee is being coerced into
receiving an immunization or if the employee refuses the
immunization and suffers an adverse action, the employee has the
right to report the violation to the department of labor, the
employer may be subject to a civil penalty, and the employee may
bring a civil action against the employer.".
Sec. 8. (a) A violation of this chapter may be reported to the
department of labor.
(b) The department of labor shall impose a civil penalty of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per incident for a violation of this
chapter.
(c) A civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited
in the state general fund.
Sec. 9. (a) An employee may bring a civil action against an
employer to enforce this chapter.
(b) If an employer is found to have violated this chapter, the
court may do the following:
(1) Award:
(A) actual damages; and
(B) court costs and reasonable attorney's fees;
to the prevailing employee.
(2) Enjoin further violation of this chapter.
Sec. 10. This chapter does not limit an employee's rights or
remedies under any other state or federal law.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1196—LS 6609/DI 141